Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.130

Legal services—Rendering or obtaining—Using name of attorney—Prohibited.

Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and other applicable laws, the debt adjuster, manager or an employee of the debt adjuster shall not:

(1) Prepare, advise, or sign a release of attachment or garnishment, stipulation, affidavit for exemption, compromise agreement or other legal or court document, nor furnish legal advice or perform legal services of any kind;

(2) Represent that he or she is authorized or competent to furnish legal advice or perform legal services;

(3) Assume authority on behalf of creditors or a debtor or accept a power of attorney authorizing it to employ or terminate the services of any attorney or to arrange the terms of or compensate for such services; or

(4) Communicate with the debtor or creditor or any other person in the name of any attorney or upon the stationery of any attorney or prepare any form or instrument which only attorneys are authorized to prepare.

[ 1999 c 151 s 107; 1967 c 201 s 13.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.